North Carolina statutes. Chapter 66. Commerce and Business.
Article 17. Closing-Out Sales.

§ 66-76.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this Article, “closing-out sale” shall mean and include all sales advertised, represented or held forth under the designation of “going out of business,” “discontinuance of business,” “selling out,” “liquidation,” “lost our lease,” “must vacate,” “forced out,” “removal,” or any other designation of like meaning; “distress sale” shall mean and include all sales in which it is represented or implied that going out of business is possible or anticipated, in which closing out is referred to in any way, or in which it is implied that business conditions are so difficult that the seller is forced to conduct the sale; and “person” shall mean and include individuals, partnerships, voluntary associations and corporations.

History.

1957, c. 1058, s. 1; 1981, c. 633, s. 1.

§ 66-77.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-103, s. 2(a), effective July 1, 2015.

History.

1957, c. 1058, s. 2; 1981, c. 633, ss. 2-4; 1987, c. 387, s. 1; repealed by 2015-103, s. 2(a), effective July 1, 2015.

Local Modification.

City of Charlotte: 2002-33, s. 1; city of Greensboro: 2002-33, s. 1, as amended by 2005-12; city of Hendersonville: 2002-33, s. 1, as amended by 2005-12, 2007-22; and Town of Cary: 2002-33, s. 1, as amended by 2005-12, 2007-22.

§ 66-78.
Additions to stock in contemplation of sale prohibited.

No person in contemplation of a closing-out sale shall order any goods, wares or merchandise for the purpose of selling and disposing of the same at such sale, and any unusual purchase and additions to the stock of such goods, wares or merchandise within 60 days prior to the filing of application for a license to conduct such sale shall be presumptive evidence that such purchases and additions to stock were made in contemplation of such sale.

History.

1957, c. 1058, s. 3; 1981, c. 633, s. 5.

§ 66-79.
Replenishment of stock prohibited.

No person carrying on or conducting a closing-out sale or a sale of goods, wares or merchandise damaged by fire, smoke, water or otherwise, shall, during the continuance of such sale, add any goods, wares or merchandise to the damaged stock inventoried in his original application for such license, and no goods, wares or merchandise shall be sold as damaged merchandise at or during such sale, excepting the goods, wares or merchandise described and inventoried in such original application.

History.

1957, c. 1058, s. 4; 1981, c. 633, s. 5.

§ 66-80.
Continuation of sale or business beyond termination date.

No person shall conduct a closing-out sale or a sale of goods, wares or merchandise damaged by fire, smoke, water or otherwise or a distress sale beyond the termination date specified for such sale; nor shall any person, upon conclusion of such sale, continue that business which had been represented as closing out or going out of business under the same name, or under a different name, at the same location, or elsewhere in the same city or town where the inventory for such sale was filed for a period of 12 months; nor shall any person, upon conclusion of such sale, continue business contrary to the designation of such sale. As used in this section, the term “person” includes individuals, partnerships, corporations, and other business entities. If a business entity that is prohibited from continuing a business under this section reformulates itself as a new entity or as an individual, whether by sale, merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, dissolution, or any other transaction, for the purpose of continuing the business, the successor entity or individual shall be considered the same person as the original entity for the purpose of this section. If an individual who is prohibited from continuing a business under this section forms a new business entity to continue the business, that entity shall be considered the same person as the individual for the purpose of this section.

History.

1957, c. 1058, s. 5; 1981, c. 633, s. 6; 1987, c. 387, s. 2; 2015-103, s. 2(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-103, s. 2(b), effective July 1, 2015, deleted “except as otherwise provided for in subsection (b) of

G.S. 66-77

” following “specified for such sale” in the first sentence.

§ 66-81.
Advertising or conducting sale contrary to Article; penalty.

Any person who shall advertise, hold, conduct or carry on any sale of goods, wares or merchandise under the description of closing-out sale or a sale of goods, wares or merchandise damaged by fire, smoke, water or otherwise or a distress sale, contrary to the provisions of this Article, or who shall violate any of the provisions of this Article shall be deemed guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1957, c. 1058, s. 6; 1981, c. 633, s. 7; 1993, c. 539, s. 519; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 66-82.
Sales excepted; liability for dissemination of false advertisement.

The provisions of this Article shall not apply to sheriffs, constables or other public or court officers, or to any other person or persons acting under the license, direction or authority of any court, State or federal, selling goods, wares or merchandise in the course of their official duties; provided, however, that no newspaper publisher, radio-broadcast licensee, television-broadcast licensee, or other agency or medium for the dissemination of advertising shall be liable under this Article by reason of the dissemination of any false advertisement prohibited by this Article, unless he has refused, on the written request of any law-enforcement officer or agency of this State, to furnish to such officer or agency the name and address of the person who caused the dissemination of such advertisement.

History.

1957, c. 1058, s. 7.

§ 66-83.
Restraining or enjoining illegal act.

Upon complaint of any person the superior court shall have jurisdiction to restrain and enjoin any act forbidden or declared illegal by any provisions of this Article.

History.

1957, c. 1058, s. 8.

§ 66-84.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 633, s. 8.